Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 6. Dog, Cat, and Wolf-Hybrid Spaying and Neutering Program and Fund

§ 3814.
Findings.

The General Assembly finds:

The supply of dogs, cats, and wolf-hybrids in Vermont is a major concern.

There are insufficient resources in this State to care for or provide homes for these animals.

Many of these animals are ultimately euthanized or become victims of accidents, starvation, or disease.

Pet owners who have limited economic resources have great difficulty affording the cost of professional spaying and neutering services.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 39.

§ 3815.
Dog, cat, and wolf-hybrid spaying and neutering program.

The Agency of Human Services shall administer a dog, cat, and wolf-hybrid spaying and neutering program providing reduced-cost spaying and neutering services and presurgical immunization for dogs, cats, and wolf-hybrids owned or cared for by individuals with low income. The Agency shall implement the program through an agreement with a qualified organization consistent with the applicable administrative rules.

The program shall reimburse veterinarians who voluntarily consent to spay or neuter dogs, cats, and wolf-hybrids under the auspices of the program. The reimbursement shall be less any co-payment by the owner of a dog, cat, or wolf-hybrid for the cost of each spaying or neutering procedure.

The Secretary of Human Services, in consultation with the chair of the Vermont Board of Veterinary Medicine, may adopt and amend rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to enable the Agency to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 39; amended

2009, No. 54

, § 77, eff. June 1, 2009;

2011, No. 57

, § 1;

2021, No. 20

, § 210.

§ 3816.
Animal Spaying And Neutering Fund; creation.

There is created, pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5, in the Agency of Human Services the Dog, Cat, and Wolf-Hybrid Spaying and Neutering Special Fund to finance the costs of the dog, cat, and wolf-hybrid spaying and neutering program established in section 3815 of this title.

Revenue for the Fund shall be derived from:

the surcharge payment paid to a municipality pursuant to subdivision 3581(c)(1) of this title;

gifts from private donors;

any appropriation that the General Assembly makes to the Fund.

Interest earned on the Fund shall be retained in the Fund.

The Agency of Human Services shall use the revenue in the Fund created in subsection (a) of this section for administering the dog, cat, and wolf-hybrid spaying and neutering program.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 39; amended

2011, No. 3

, § 86, eff. Feb. 17, 2011;

2011, No. 57

, § 2.

§ 3817.
Rules; adoption authority.

The Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets may adopt rules to implement this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 39.